Massachusetts, session 194th, H3009.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Clause Twenty-second of section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2012 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first 2 paragraphs
and inserting in place thereof the following 2 paragraphs:-
Twenty-second, Real estate of the following classes of persons who are legal residents of
the commonwealth and who are veterans, as defined in clause Forty-third of section 7 of chapter
4, and whose last discharge or release from the armed forces was under other than dishonorable
conditions and who were domiciled in Massachusetts for at least 6 months prior to entering such
service, or who have resided in the commonwealth for 5 consecutive years next prior to date of
filing for exemptions under this clause, hereinafter referred to in this clause as soldiers and
sailors, provided such real estate is occupied in whole or in part as his domicile by such person,
of 3

and provided, further that if the spouse of the soldier or sailor is also a soldier or sailor each shall
receive the amount of exemption provided in this clause to the same extent as if unmarried, to the
amount of $2000 of assessed taxable valuation or the sum of $400, or the amount of money
which corresponds with the percentage of the soldier or sailor’s disability as provided in
paragraph (a), whichever would result in an abatement of the greater amount of actual taxes due.
No real estate shall be so exempt which the assessors shall adjudge has been conveyed to a
soldier or sailor or to the spouse, surviving spouse, father or mother of a soldier or sailor to evade
taxation.
(a) Soldiers and sailors who, as a result of disabilities contracted while in the line of duty,
have a disability rating of 10 per cent or more as determined by the Veterans Administration or
by any branch of the armed forces. The department of revenue shall establish an incremental
exemption scale, which shall provide no less than $400 for a disability rating of 10 per cent and
no more than $1,000 for a disability rating of 100 per cent, with increments of disability
increasing by no greater than 10 per cent for each corresponding exemption amount. After the
assessors have allowed an exemption under this clause, no further evidence of the existence of
the facts required by this clause shall be required in any subsequent year in the city or town in
which the exemption has been allowed, unless the disability rating determined by the Veterans
Administration or any branch of the armed forces is reduced to less than 10 per cent; provided,
however, that the assessors may refuse to allow an exemption in any subsequent year if they
become aware that the soldier or sailor did not satisfy all of the requisites of this clause at the
time the exemption was first granted.
SECTION 2. The department of revenue, in collaboration with the commissioner of
veterans’ affairs shall issue the incremental exemption scale required by paragraph (a) of clause
of 3

Twenty-second of section 5 of chapter 59 and any rules or regulations necessary to implement
such scale on or before January 1, 2027.
of 3